Florida, session 2026, HB419.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
29
30 Section 1. Section 908.14, Florida Statutes, is created to
31 read:
32 908.14 Visible Identification Standards for Immigration-
33 Based Law Enforcement Act.—
34 (1) This section may be cited as the "VISIBLE Act."
35 (2) As used in this section, the term:
36 (a) "Covered immigration officer" means a person who is
37 authorized to perform immigration enforcement functions and who
38 is:
39 1. An officer or employee of a law enforcement agency;
40 2. An officer or employee of United States Customs and
41 Border Protection;
42 3. An officer or employee of United States Immigration and
43 Customs Enforcement; or
44 4. A person authorized, deputized, or designated under
45 federal law, regulation, or agreement to perform immigration
46 enforcement functions.
47 (b) "Public immigration enforcement function" means any
48 activity that involves the direct exercise of federal
49 immigration authority through public-facing actions, including a
50 patrol, a stop, an arrest, a search, an interview to determine
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb419-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 419 2026
51 immigration status, a raid, a checkpoint inspection, or the
52 service of a judicial or administrative warrant. The term does
53 not include covert, nonpublic operations or nonenforcement
54 activities.
55 (c) "Visible identification" means the display of the name
56 or widely recognized initials of the employing agency of a
57 covered immigration officer and the officer's last name or badge
58 or identification number in a size and format that complies with
59 the requirements in subsection (4).
60 (3) A covered immigration officer who directly engages in
61 a public immigration enforcement function within this state must
62 wear visible identification at all times during such engagement.
63 (4) The visible identification must:
64 (a) For the employing agency of the covered immigration
65 officer, be displayed in a size and format that is clearly
66 legible from a distance of not less than 25 feet, using
67 materials or markings suitable for visibility in both daylight
68 and low-light conditions under normal operational conditions.
69 (b) For the covered immigration officer's last name or
70 badge or identification number, be displayed in a manner that is
71 clearly visible and readable during direct engagement with the
72 public.
73 (c) Be displayed on the covered immigration officer's
74 outermost garment or gear and may not be obscured by tactical
75 equipment, body armor, or accessories.
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb419-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 419 2026
76 (5) A covered immigration officer may not wear nonmedical
77 face coverings, including masks or balaclavas, which impair the
78 visibility of the identifying information required under this
79 section or obscure the officer's face unless such face covering
80 is necessary to protect the integrity of a covert, nonpublic
81 operation or to guard against hazardous environmental
82 conditions.
83 (6) The State Board of Immigration Enforcement shall do
84 all of the following:
85 (a) Receive and investigate complaints from the public
86 concerning violations of this section.
87 (b) Ensure that a covered immigration officer who fails to
88 comply with the requirements of this section receives
89 appropriate disciplinary action, including a written reprimand,
90 suspension, or other personnel action, consistent with the
91 policies of the officer's employing agency and any applicable
92 collective bargaining agreement.
93 (c) Make recommendations to the Legislature concerning
94 compliance with this section and corrective actions that should
95 be taken.
96 (d) Carry out its responsibilities under this section in
97 accordance with its statutory authority.
98 (7) By June 30, 2027, and annually thereafter, the State
99 Immigration Enforcement Council shall submit a report to the
100 President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb419-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 419 2026
101 Representatives that includes all of the following information:
102 (a) The total number of public immigration enforcement
103 functions conducted during the reporting period.
104 (b) The number of documented instances of noncompliance
105 with this section.
106 (c) A summary of disciplinary or remedial actions taken
107 against any covered immigration officer who did not comply with
108 this section.
109 Section 2. Paragraph (h) is added to subsection (3) of
110 section 908.1031, Florida Statutes, to read:
111 908.1031 State Board of Immigration Enforcement; creation;
112 purpose and duties.—
113 (3) The board is the chief immigration enforcement officer
114 of the state and shall:
115 (h) Investigate any complaints received for violations of
116 and otherwise enforce the Visible Identification Standards for
117 Immigration-Based Law Enforcement Act pursuant to s. 908.14.
118 Section 3. Paragraph (i) is added to subsection (4) of
119 section 908.1032, Florida Statutes, to read:
120 908.1032 State Immigration Enforcement Council.—The State
121 Immigration Enforcement Council, an advisory council as defined
122 in s. 20.03, is created within the State Board of Immigration
123 Enforcement for the purpose of advising the board.
124 (4) The council shall:
125 (i) Collect data relating to the Visible Identification
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb419-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 419 2026
126 Standards for Immigration-Based Law Enforcement Act and, by June
127 30 of each year, submit a report to the President of the Senate
128 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives in accordance
129 with s. 908.14.
130 Section 4. Section 943.1718, Florida Statutes, is amended
131 to read:
132 943.1718 Body cameras and face coverings; policies and
133 procedures; penalties.—
134 (1) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
135 (a) "Body camera" means a portable electronic recording
136 device that is worn on a law enforcement officer's person that
137 records audio and video data of the officer's law-enforcement-
138 related encounters and activities.
139 (b)1. "Face covering" means any opaque mask, garment,
140 helmet, or other item, including, but not limited to, a
141 balaclava, tactical mask, gator, ski mask, or any other similar
142 type of facial covering or face-shielding item, which conceals
143 or obscures the face of a person.
144 2. The term does not include any of the following:
145 a. A translucent face shield or clear mask that does not
146 conceal the wearer's face.
147 b. A medical mask or surgical mask used to protect against
148 the transmission of disease or infection.
149 c. Any other mask or device, including, but not limited
150 to, air-purifying respirators, full or half masks, or self-
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb419-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 419 2026
151 contained breathing apparatuses necessary to protect against
152 exposure to a toxin, gas, smoke, or any other hazardous
153 environmental condition.
154 (c)(b) "Law enforcement agency" means an agency that has a
155 primary mission of preventing and detecting crime and enforcing
156 the penal, criminal, traffic, and motor vehicle laws of the
157 state and in furtherance of that primary mission employs law
158 enforcement officers as defined in s. 943.10.
159 (d)(c) "Law enforcement officer" has the same meaning as
160 provided in s. 943.10.
161 (e) "Undercover investigation" means a planned act
162 authorized by a law enforcement agency or a court order which
163 uses an undercover operative to intentionally interact with a
164 suspect or others or to obtain evidence of criminal activity.
165 (f) "Undercover operative" means a law enforcement officer
166 or a full-time sworn officer in this state or another state or
167 the Federal Government using an assumed name or cover identity
168 to interact with persons or entities to collect evidence of
169 criminal activity.
170 (2) BODY CAMERAS.—
171 (a) A law enforcement agency that permits its law
172 enforcement officers to wear body cameras shall establish
173 policies and procedures addressing the proper use, maintenance,
174 and storage of body cameras and the data recorded by body
175 cameras. The policies and procedures must include:
Page 7 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb419-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 419 2026
176 1.(a) General guidelines for the proper use, maintenance,
177 and storage of body cameras.
178 2.(b) Any limitations on which law enforcement officers
179 are permitted to wear body cameras.
180 3.(c) Any limitations on law-enforcement-related
181 encounters and activities in which law enforcement officers are
182 permitted to wear body cameras.
183 4.(d) A provision permitting a law enforcement officer
184 using a body camera to review the recorded footage from the body
185 camera, upon his or her own initiative or request, before
186 writing a report or providing a statement regarding any event
187 arising within the scope of his or her official duties. Any such
188 provision may not apply to an officer's inherent duty to
189 immediately disclose information necessary to secure an active
190 crime scene or to identify suspects or witnesses.
191 5.(e) General guidelines for the proper storage,
192 retention, and release of audio and video data recorded by body
193 cameras.
194 (b)(3) A law enforcement agency that permits its law
195 enforcement officers to wear body cameras shall:
196 1.(a) Ensure that all personnel who wear, use, maintain,
197 or store body cameras are trained in the law enforcement
198 agency's policies and procedures concerning them.
199 2.(b) Ensure that all personnel who use, maintain, store,
200 or release audio or video data recorded by body cameras are
Page 8 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb419-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 419 2026
201 trained in the law enforcement agency's policies and procedures.
202 3.(c) Retain audio and video data recorded by body cameras
203 in accordance with the requirements of s. 119.021, except as
204 otherwise provided by law.
205 4.(d) Perform a periodic review of actual agency body
206 camera practices to ensure conformity with the agency's policies
207 and procedures.
208 (c)(4) Chapter 934 does not apply to body camera
209 recordings made by law enforcement agencies that elect to use
210 body cameras.
211 (3) FACE COVERINGS.—
212 (a) A law enforcement officer may not wear a face covering
213 in the performance of his or her official duties.
214 (b) Before undertaking an undercover investigation that is
215 reasonably likely to involve a law enforcement officer wearing a
216 face covering in the performance of his or her official duties,
217 a law enforcement agency must provide advance notice to the
218 sheriff with jurisdiction over the location in which the
219 undercover investigation takes place. Such notice must be given
220 at least 12 hours before the undercover investigation begins and
221 must include when and where the law enforcement officer will be
222 operating, his or her planned actions, and the approximate time
223 and duration of the undercover investigation.
224 (c) Paragraph (a) does not apply to:
225 1. A law enforcement officer performing his or her duties
Page 9 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb419-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 419 2026
226 as an undercover operative during an active undercover
227 investigation;
228 2. Protective gear used by a Special Weapons and Tactics
229 (SWAT) team officer which is necessary to protect his or her
230 face from harm while performing SWAT team duties and
231 responsibilities; or
232 3. Exigent circumstances that involve an immediate danger
233 or threat to persons or property or the escape of a perpetrator.
234 (d) A first violation of this subsection is an infraction.
235 A second or subsequent violation of this subsection is a
236 misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as provided in s.
237 775.082 or s. 775.083.
238 (e) On or before October 1, 2026, the Department of Law
239 Enforcement shall adopt rules regulating the use of face
240 coverings to comply with this subsection.
241 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 10 of 10
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb419-00